California statutes. Public Resources Code
“Special district” means any public agency, other than a local government as defined in this chapter, formed pursuant to general law or special act for the local performance of governmental or proprietary functions within limited boundaries. “Special district” includes, but is not limited to, a county service area, a maintenance district or area, an improvement district or improvement zone, or any other zone or area, formed for the purpose of designating an area within which a property tax rate will be levied to pay for a service or improvement benefiting that area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30118.5.

“Special treatment area” means an identifiable and geographically bounded forested area within the coastal zone that constitutes a significant habitat area, area of special scenic significance, and any land where logging activities could adversely affect a public recreation area or the biological productivity of any wetland, estuary, or stream especially valuable because of its role in a coastal ecosystem.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 585.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30119.

“State university” means the University of California and the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 214.)
-------------------------------------------

30120.

“Treatment works” shall have the same meaning as set forth in the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. 1251, et seq.) and any other federal act which amends or supplements the Federal Water Pollution Control Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30121.

“Wetland” means lands within the coastal zone which may be covered periodically or permanently with shallow water and include saltwater marshes, freshwater marshes, open or closed brackish water marshes, swamps, mudflats, and fens.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30122.

“Zoning ordinance” means an ordinance authorized by Section 65850 of the Government Code or, in the case of a charter city, a similar ordinance enacted pursuant to the authority of its charter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 919.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Revisions to the Coastal Zone Boundary [30150. - 30174.]

30150.

Notwithstanding the maps adopted pursuant to Section 17 of Chapter 1330 of the Statutes of 1976, as amended by Section 29 of Chapter 1331 of the Statutes of 1976, the inland boundary of the coastal zone, as shown on the detailed coastal maps adopted by the commission on March 1, 1977, is amended by maps 1 to 35, inclusive, dated September 12, 1979, and which are on file in the office of the commission. Maps 1 to 35, inclusive, are hereby adopted by reference.

The areas deleted and added to the coastal zone are specifically shown on maps 1 to 35, inclusive, adopted by this section, and are generally described in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

30152.

In Del Norte County:

(a) Near the community of Smith River, approximately 255 acres are excluded as specifically shown on map 1.

(b) The Fort Dick, Kings Valley, and Meadowbrook Acres areas are excluded as specifically shown on maps 2 and 3.

(c) In and near the City of Crescent City, approximately 2,250 acres between Lake Earl Drive and State Highway Route 101 and other partially urbanized areas, such as the Bertsch Subdivision, are excluded as specifically shown on maps 2 and 3.

(d) In the City of Crescent City, approximately two acres are excluded as specifically shown on map 2A, dated May 5, 1982, and filed on May 20, 1982, with the Office of the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1470, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

30154.

In Humboldt County:

(a) In and near the City of Fortuna, approximately 265 acres seaward of State Highway Route 101 are excluded as specifically shown on map 4.

(b) All of the incorporated land of the City of Ferndale as of January 1, 1979, is excluded as specifically shown on map 4A. The city shall consider work completed pursuant to its local coastal program in the course of preparing or revising its general plan. Notwithstanding any provision of Division 21 (commencing with Section 31000) to the contrary, the State Coastal Conservancy may undertake projects within the city without approval of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1109.)
-------------------------------------------

30156.

In San Mateo County, within the Butano Creek watershed, the boundary is moved seaward to the five-mile limit described in Section 30103 and as specifically shown on map 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1109.)
-------------------------------------------

30156.1.

In San Mateo County, in the City of Pacifica, approximately 11 acres situated east of State Highway Route 1 and described in Director’s Deed DD-028764-01-01 from the Director of Transportation, is included, as specifically shown on Map 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1381, Sec. 2.   Repealed conditionally on January 1, 1994, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 1381.)
-------------------------------------------

30158.

In Santa Cruz County:

(a) Near the community of Bonny Doon, the boundary is moved seaward to the five-mile limit described in Section 30103 and as specifically shown on maps 6 and 7.

(b) In the Watsonville area approximately 40 acres in the southwest portion of the city are excluded as specifically shown on map 8.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1109.)
-------------------------------------------

30160.

In Monterey County:

(a) In the City of Marina, approximately 400 acres between Del Monte Boulevard and the new alignment of State Highway Route 1 are excluded as specifically shown on map 9.

(b) In the City of Sand City approximately 125 acres landward of a 200-foot buffer along the new alignment of State Highway Route 1 are excluded as specifically shown on map 10; provided, however, a buffer of 100 feet along either side of the railroad right-of-way through the city together with such right-of-way are not excluded.

(c) In the City of Seaside approximately 29 acres northeast of Laguna del Rey are excluded as specifically shown on map 10; provided, however, a 125-foot buffer along the edge of Laguna Grande, a 100-foot buffer along each side of the channel connecting Roberts Lake and Laguna Grande, and a 100-foot buffer along either side of the railroad right-of-way together with such right-of-way are not excluded.

(d) In the City of Monterey, the downtown area, and the Cannery Row area between Lighthouse Avenue and the extreme edge of the railroad right-of-way, are excluded as specifically shown on map 11; provided, however, that the one block area bounded by Foam Street and Wave Street, and Prescott Avenue and Hoffman Avenue, is not excluded.

Notwithstanding any map referenced by Section 30150, dated September 12, 1979, and filed on September 14, 1979, with the office of the Secretary of State, the inland coastal zone boundary described in this subdivision shall be as prescribed by the amendments to this section made during the second year of the 1979–80 Regular Session of the Legislature.

(e) In the City of Pacific Grove approximately 300 acres are excluded as specifically shown on map 11; provided, however, that the railroad right-of-way is not excluded.

(f) In the Del Monte Forest, approximately 90 acres known as the Navaho Tract are added as specifically shown on map 11.

(g) In the area between the intersection of the boundary and the easterly line of Section 26, T. 17 S., R. 1 E., M.D.M. and the intersection of the boundary and the northeasterly corner of Section 1, T. 19 S., R. 1 E., M.D.M., and in the vicinity of the head of the Middle Fork of Devil’s Canyon and the head of the South Fork of Devil’s Canyon the boundary is moved seaward to the five-mile limit described in Section 30103 and as specifically shown on maps 12, 13, and 14.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 170, Sec. 1.   Effective June 12, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

30162.

In Santa Barbara County:

(a) In Rancho San Julian and generally within the watershed of Jalama Creek, the boundary is moved seaward to the five-mile limit described in Section 30103 and as specifically shown on map 16.

(b) In the Devereux Lagoon and Goleta Slough areas, approximately 170 acres are excluded and 245 acres are added as specifically shown on maps 17 and 18; provided, however, that the land areas on which the University of California has proposed a 200 unit housing project are not included.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1109.)
-------------------------------------------

30164.

In Ventura County:

(a) Near the mouth of the Ventura River, approximately 190 acres are added as specifically shown on map 19.

(b) In the City of San Buenaventura, approximately 240 acres are excluded as specifically shown on map 19.

(c) In the City of Oxnard and a small unincorporated area, approximately 130 acres are excluded and approximately 85 acres are added as specifically shown on map 20.

(d) In the area described as Section 36, T. 1 N., R. 20 W., S.B.B.L., the boundary is moved seaward to the five-mile limit described in Section 30103 and as specifically shown on map 21.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1109.)
-------------------------------------------

30166.

In Los Angeles County:

(a) In three locations within the Santa Monica Mountains, the boundary is moved seaward to the five-mile limit described in Section 30103 and as specifically shown on maps 22, 23, and 24.

(b) In the Temescal Canyon watershed in the City of Los Angeles, all lands owned or controlled by the Presbyterian Synod, the University of California, the Los Angeles County Sanitation District, and the Los Angeles Unified School District are added.

(c) In the Cities of Los Angeles and El Segundo, the areas east of Vista del Mar that include the Scattergood Steam Plant, the Hyperion Sewage Treatment Plant, and portions of an oil refinery are
 excluded as specifically shown on map 25. In adopting this boundary change, the Legislature specifically reaffirms the existing location of the coastal zone boundary in the Venice area of the City of Los Angeles.

(d) In the City of Manhattan Beach, approximately 140 acres, and in the City of Hermosa Beach, approximately 170 acres, are excluded as specifically shown on maps 25 and 26.

(e) In the City of Palos Verdes Estates, approximately 95 acres landward of Paseo del Mar are excluded as specifically shown on map 26.

(f) In the City of Long Beach, the area near Colorado Lagoon is excluded as specifically shown on map 27.

(g) In the City of Long Beach, the area commencing at the intersection of the existing coastal zone boundary at Colorado Street and
 Pacific Coast Highway, thence southerly along Pacific Coast Highway to the intersection of Loynes Drive, thence easterly along Loynes Drive to the intersection of Los Cerritos Channel, thence northerly along Los Cerritos Channel to the existing coastal zone boundary, is excluded as specifically shown on map 27A.

(h) Notwithstanding map number 138 adopted pursuant to Section 17 of Chapter 1330 of the Statutes of 1976, as amended by Section 29 of Chapter 1331 of the Statutes of 1976, the inland boundary of the coastal zone in Los Angeles County in the vicinity of Los Angeles International Airport shall be the Pershing Drive built after January 1, 1970, rather than the Pershing Drive built before that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 102, Sec. 3.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30166.5.

(a) On or before January 15, 2002, the commission shall submit to the City of Malibu an initial draft of the land use portion of the local coastal program for the City of Malibu portion of the coastal zone, which is specifically delineated on maps 133, 134, 135, and 136, which were placed on file with the Secretary of State on September 14, 1979.

(b) On or before September 15, 2002, the commission shall, after public hearing and consultation with the City of Malibu, adopt a local coastal program for that area within the City of Malibu portion of the coastal zone that is specifically delineated on maps 133, 134, 135, and 136, which have been placed on file with the Secretary of State on March 14, 1977, and March 1, 1987. The local coastal program for the area shall, after adoption by the commission, be deemed certified, and shall, for all purposes of this division, constitute the certified local coastal program for the area. Subsequent to the certification of the local coastal program, the City of Malibu shall immediately assume coastal development permitting authority, pursuant to this division. Notwithstanding the requirements of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 65920) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, once the City of Malibu assumes coastal development permitting authority pursuant to this section, no application for a coastal development permit shall be deemed approved if the city fails to take timely action to approve or deny the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 952, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

30168.

In Orange County:

(a) In the City of Huntington Beach, approximately 9.5 acres are added as specifically shown on map 28.

(b) In the City of Costa Mesa, approximately 15 acres are excluded as specifically shown on map 28.

(c) In the City of Newport Beach, approximately 22.6 acres adjacent to Pacific Coast Highway are added as specifically shown on map 28; provided, however, that the area described in this subdivision shall be excluded from the coastal zone, if the Department of Transportation, within one year from the effective date of this act, enters into an agreement for use of this area for hospital-related purposes.

(d) In the Niguel Hill area, the developed portions of Pacific Island Village are excluded as specifically shown on map 29.

(e) In the communities of Dana Point and Laguna Niguel, approximately 450 acres inland of the Pacific Coast Highway are excluded as specifically shown on map 29A.

(f) In the community of Capistrano Beach, approximately 381 acres seaward of the San Diego Freeway are excluded as specifically shown on map 29A.

(g) In the City of San Clemente, approximately 230 acres seaward of the San Diego Freeway are added as specifically shown on map 29B, dated September 1, 1981, and filed on September 1, 1981, with the Office of the Secretary of State.

(h) In the City of San Clemente,
 approximately 214 acres inland and seaward of the San Diego Freeway are excluded as specifically shown on maps 29A and 30.

(i) Notwithstanding map number 149 adopted pursuant to Section 17 of Chapter 1330 of the Statutes of 1976, as amended by Section 29 of Chapter 1331 of the Statutes of 1976, the inland boundary of the coastal zone in the area of the City of San Juan Capistrano in Orange County shall exclude all portions of the City of San Juan Capistrano and shall follow Camino Capistrano and Via Serra and generally an extension of Via Serra to the point where it joins the existing coastal zone boundary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 102, Sec. 4.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30169.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that a dispute exists as to the proper location of the inland boundary of the coastal zone in the area commonly known as Aliso Viejo and that, after extensive review of the history of this boundary segment, the criteria utilized to establish the boundary in 1976, and the relevant topographical information, it is possible to reach differing conclusions of equal validity regarding the proper location of the coastal zone boundary. The Legislature further finds that it is not possible to determine objectively which ridgeline feature in the Aliso Viejo area most closely approximates the boundary criteria utilized by the Legislature in 1976, and that it is in the best
 public interest to resolve the current boundary dispute in order to avoid further delay in the completion of the local coastal program for Orange County. The Legislature further finds that a timely resolution of this boundary dispute can best be accomplished by adjusting the coastal zone boundary in the manner set forth in this section and within the general framework of Section 30103 and consistent with the need to protect the coastal resources of the Aliso Viejo area and to carry out the requirements of Section 30213.

(b) In the Aliso Creek area of Orange County approximately 286 acres are added and approximately 1,020 acres are excluded as specifically shown on maps 28A and 28B dated April 15, 1980, and filed on April 22, 1980, with the office of the Secretary of State and which are on file in the office of the commission. The maps
 are hereby adopted by reference. The changes made in the inland boundary of the coastal zone by this section are in addition to any changes made by any map referred to in Section 30150, except to the extent that the changes made by this section affect a segment of the boundary previously changed by the map, in which case the changes made by this section shall supersede any of those previous changes.

(c) The executive director of the commission may adjust the precise location of the inland boundary of the coastal zone not more than 100 yards in either a seaward or landward direction in order to conform the precise boundary location to the specific limits of development adjacent to the coastal zone boundary as shown on maps 28A and 28B. However, in any subdivided area, the executive director may adjust the precise location of the inland boundary
 of the coastal zone not more than 100 feet in a landward direction in order to include any development of the first row of lots immediately adjacent to the boundary as shown on those maps, where the executive director determines that the adjustment is necessary to ensure that adequate controls will be applied to the development in order to minimize any potential adverse effects on the coastal zone resources. The executive director shall prepare a detailed map showing any of the changes and shall file a copy of the map with the county clerk.

(d) Prior to the adoption and approval of a drainage control plan by the County of Orange for the Aliso Viejo Planned Community (as designated by Amendment No. L. U. 79-1 to the Land Use Element of the Orange County General Plan), the county shall consult with the executive director of the commission to
 ensure that any drainage control facilities located outside the coastal zone are adequate to provide for no increase in peak runoff, by virtue of the development of the Aliso Viejo Planned Community, which would result in adverse impacts on coastal zone resources.

(e) On or before January 31, 1981, the commission shall, after public hearing and in consultation with the County of Orange, certify or reject a local coastal program segment prepared and submitted by the county on or before August 1, 1980, for the following parcel in the Aliso Creek area: land owned by the Aliso Viejo Company, a California corporation, as of April 22, 1980, within the coastal zone as amended by this section. The local coastal program required by this subdivision shall, for all purposes of this division, constitute a certified local coastal program segment for
 that parcel in the County of Orange. The segment of the county’s local coastal program for the parcel may be amended pursuant to this division relating to the amendment of local coastal programs. If the commission neither certifies nor rejects the submitted local coastal program within the time limit specified in this subdivision, the land added to the coastal zone by this section shall no longer be subject to this division. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this subdivision, that a procedure to expedite the preparation and adoption of a local coastal program for that land be established so that the public and the affected property owner know as soon as possible what uses are permissible.

(f) The commission, through its executive director, shall enter into a binding and enforceable agreement with Aliso Viejo Company, and the
 agreement shall be recorded as a covenant to run with the land with no prior liens other than tax and assessment liens restricting the Aliso Viejo Planned Community. The agreement shall provide for all of the following:

(1) The Aliso Viejo Company shall provide at least 1,000 units of for-sale housing to moderate-income persons at prices affordable to a range of households earning from 81 to 120 percent of the median income for Orange County as adjusted for family size pursuant to the commission’s housing guidelines on affordable housing dated January 22, 1980, and July 16, 1979, and any additional provisions as agreed to between the commission and the Aliso Viejo Company as referred to in this subdivision.

For purposes of this subdivision, median income constitutes the figure most recently
 established by the Department of Housing and Urban Development at the time the public report for the units, or any portion thereof, is issued by the Bureau of Real Estate. The affordable units required by this subdivision shall be priced equally over the moderate-income range and shall reflect a reasonable mix as to size and number of bedrooms.

(2) The 1,000 units provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be sold subject to controls on resale substantially as provided in the commission’s housing guidelines on affordable housing, dated January 22, 1980, and July 16, 1979, and any additional provisions as agreed to between the commission and the Aliso Viejo Company as referred to in this subdivision. On or before entering the agreement provided for herein, the Aliso Viejo Company shall enter into an agreement, approved by the executive
 director of the commission, with the Orange County Housing Authority or any other appropriate housing agency acceptable to the executive director of the commission to provide for the administration of the resale controls including the qualification of purchasers.

(3) The 1,000 units provided pursuant to this subdivision may be dispersed throughout the Aliso Viejo Planned Community, and shall be completed and offered for sale prior to, or simultaneously with, other units in the overall project, so that at any time at least 712 percent of the units constructed shall be resale-controlled until the 1,000 units are completed.

(4) The Department of Housing and Community Development and the
 County of Orange shall be third-party beneficiaries to the agreement provided in this subdivision and shall have the power to enforce any and all provisions of the agreement.

(5) This agreement may only be amended upon the determination of the Aliso Viejo Company or its successors or assigns, the commission, the Department of Housing and Community Development, and the County of Orange that the change is necessary in order to prevent adverse effects on the supply of low- and moderate-income housing opportunities and to improve the methods of providing the housing at continually affordable prices.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, because the Aliso Viejo Company, in addition to the 1,000 units of controlled housing provided in this subdivision, will provide for 2,000 units of subsidized
 affordable housing for low-income persons and 2,000 affordable housing units for moderate-income persons pursuant to the company’s housing program, the purposes of Section 30213 will be met by enactment of this subdivision. The Legislature further finds and declares that the general provisions of this subdivision are specifically described and set forth in letters by Aliso Viejo Company and the executive director of the commission published in the Journals of the Senate and the Assembly of the 1979–80 Regular Session, and it is the intent of the Legislature that the commission and Aliso Viejo Company conform the agreement provided in this subdivision to the specific provisions described in the letters.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the application of this division by the commission to the development or use of any
 infrastructure necessary and appropriate to serve development within the portions of the Aliso Viejo Planned Community located inland of the coastal zone as amended by this section, shall be strictly limited to addressing direct impacts on coastal zone resources and shall be carried out in a manner that assures that the infrastructure will be provided. Furthermore, the commission shall amend without conditions its prior permit No. A-61-76 to provide for its release of sewer outfall flow limitations necessary and appropriate to serve the Aliso Viejo Planned Community located inland of the coastal zone as amended by this subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, “infrastructure” means those facilities and improvements necessary and appropriate to develop, construct, and serve urban communities, including but not limited to, streets, roads, and highways; transportation systems and facilities; schools; parks;
 water and sewage systems and facilities; electric, gas, and communications systems and facilities; and drainage and flood control systems and facilities. Notwithstanding this subdivision, the commission may limit, or reasonably condition, the use of the transit corridor in Aliso Creek Valley to transit uses, uses approved by the commission that will serve the Aliso Greenbelt Project prepared by the State Coastal Conservancy, the provision of access to and from the sewage treatment works in Aliso Creek Valley, emergency uses, and drainage and flood control systems and facilities and other services approved pursuant to this subdivision.

(h) This section shall become operative only when the commission and Aliso Viejo Company have entered into the binding and enforceable agreement provided for in this section, and the agreement has been duly
 recorded with the county recorder of Orange County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 487.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

30170.

In San Diego County:

(a) In the City of Oceanside, approximately 500 acres are excluded as specifically shown on maps 30A and 31.

(b) In the City of Carlsbad, approximately 180 acres in the downtown area, except for the Elm Street corridor, are excluded as specifically shown on map 31.

(c) In the City of Carlsbad, the area lying north of the Palomar Airport as generally shown on maps 31 and 32 and as specifically described in this subdivision is excluded.

Those portions of lots “F” and “G” of Rancho Agua Hedionda, part in the City of Carlsbad and part in the unincorporated area
 of the County of San Diego, State of California, according to the partition map thereof No. 823, filed in the office of the county recorder of that county, November 16, 1896, described as follows:

And those properties known as assessors parcel Nos. 212-020-08, 212-020-22, and 212-020-23.

Excepting therefrom, that portion, if any, conveyed to the County
 of San Diego, by quitclaim deed recorded January 12, 1977, at recorder’s file/page No. 012820 of said official records.

No development may occur in the area described in this subdivision until a plan for drainage of the parcel to be developed has been approved by the local government having jurisdiction over the area after consultation with the commission and the Department of Fish and Wildlife. The plan shall assure that no detrimental increase occurs in runoff of water from the parcel to be developed and shall require that the facilities necessary to implement the plan are installed as part of the development.

(d) In the City of Carlsbad and adjacent unincorporated areas, approximately 600 acres consisting
 of the Palomar Airport and an adjoining industrial park are excluded as specifically shown on maps 31 and 32.

(e) An area consisting of approximately 333 acres lying west and south of the Palomar Airport and bounded on the south by Palomar Airport Road is excluded as specifically shown on maps 31 and 32.

No development may occur in the area described in this subdivision until a plan for drainage of the parcel to be developed has been approved by the local government having jurisdiction over the area after consultation with the commission and the Department of Fish and Wildlife. The plan shall assure that no detrimental increase occurs in runoff of water from the parcel to be developed and shall require that
 the facilities necessary to implement the plan are installed as part of the development.

(f) On or before October 1, 1980, the commission shall, after public hearing and in consultation with the City of Carlsbad, prepare, approve, and adopt a local coastal program for the following parcels in the vicinity of Batiquitos Lagoon within the City of Carlsbad: lands owned by Rancho La Costa, a registered limited partnership, lands (consisting of approximately 80 acres) owned by Standard Pacific of San Diego, Inc., that were conveyed by Rancho La Costa on October 8, 1977, and lands owned by the Occidental Petroleum Company. Those parcels shall be determined by ownership as of September 12, 1979. As used in this subdivision, “parcels” means the parcels identified in this paragraph. The local coastal program required by this subdivision shall include all of the following elements:

(1) Protection of agricultural lands and uses to the extent feasible.

(2) Minimization of adverse impacts from sedimentation.

(3) Protection of feasible public recreational opportunities.

(4) Provision for economically feasible development consistent with the three elements specified in this subdivision.

The local coastal program required by this subdivision shall, after adoption by the commission, be deemed certified and shall for all purposes of this division constitute certified local coastal program segments for those parcels in the City of Carlsbad. The segments of the city’s local coastal program for those parcels may be amended pursuant to the provisions of this division relating to the amendment of local coastal programs. In addition, until (i) the City
 of Carlsbad adopts or enacts the implementing actions contained in the local coastal program, or (ii) other statutory provisions provide alternately for the adoption, certification, and implementation of a local coastal program for those parcels, the local coastal program required by this subdivision may also be amended by the commission at the request of the owner of any of those parcels. For administrative purposes, the commission may group these requests in order to schedule them for consideration at a single commission hearing. However, the commission shall schedule these requests for consideration at least once during each four-month period, beginning January 1, 1982. After either of these events occur, however, these property owners shall no longer be eligible to request the commission to amend the local coastal program.

If the commission fails to adopt a local coastal program within the time limits specified in this subdivision, those parcels shall be
 excluded from the coastal zone and shall no longer be subject to this division. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this subdivision that a procedure to expedite the preparation and adoption of a local coastal program for those parcels be established so that the public and affected property owners know as soon as possible what the permissible uses of those lands are.

(g) In the vicinity of the intersection of Del Mar Heights Road and the San Diego Freeway, approximately 250 acres are excluded as specifically shown on map 33.

(h) In the vicinity of the intersection of Carmel Valley Road and the San Diego Freeway, approximately 45 acres are added as specifically shown on map 33.

In the City of San Diego, the Carmel Valley area consisting of approximately 1,400 acres as shown on map 33 that has been placed on file with the
 Secretary of State on January 23, 1980, shall be excluded from the coastal zone after the City of San Diego submits, and the commission certifies, a drainage plan and a transportation plan for the area. The city shall implement and enforce the certified drainage and transportation plans. Any amendments or changes to the underlying land use plan for the area that affects drainage, or to either the certified drainage or transportation plan, shall be reviewed and processed in the same manner as an amendment of a certified local coastal program pursuant to Section 30514. Any land use not in conformance with the certified drainage and transportation plans may be appealed to the commission pursuant to the appeals procedure as provided by Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 30600). The drainage plan and any amendments thereto shall be prepared after consultation with the Department of Fish and
 Wildlife and shall ensure that problems resulting from water runoff, sedimentation, and siltation are adequately identified and resolved.

(i) Near the head of the south branch of Los Penasquitos Canyon, the boundary is moved seaward to the five-mile limit as described in Section 30103 and as specifically shown on map 33.

(j) In the City of San Diego, approximately 1,855 acres known as the Mount Soledad and La Jolla Mesa areas are added as specifically shown on map 34. However, on or before February 29, 1980, and pursuant to either subdivision (d) of Section 30610 or Section 30610.5, the commission shall exclude from coastal development permit requirements any single-family residence within the area specified in this subdivision. No coastal development permit shall be required for any improvement, maintenance activity, relocation, or
 reasonable expansion of any commercial radio or television transmission facilities within the area specified in this subdivision unless the proposed activity could result in a significant change in the density or intensity of use in the area or could have a significant adverse impact on highly scenic resources of public importance. However, no prior review by the commission of this activity shall be required.

(k) In the City of San Diego, approximately 30 acres known as the Famosa Slough is added as specifically shown on maps 34 and 35.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30170.6.

Notwithstanding Section 17 of Chapter 1330 of the Statutes of 1976, as amended by Section 29 of Chapter 1331 of the Statutes of 1976, any map dated September 12, 1979, and filed on September 14, 1979, with the office of the Secretary of State, or any provision of Section 30170, the inland boundary of the coastal zone in a portion of San Diego County, of approximately 95 acres in Penasquitos Canyon, is hereby amended as indicated by revised map number 33, dated March 21, 1980, and filed on March 21, 1980, with the office of the Secretary of State; provided, that the City of San Diego first submits and the commission approves a drainage plan for the area providing for drainage in connection with the extension of Mira Mesa Boulevard to Interstate Highway 805 sufficient to assure that no detrimental increase in runoff of water into Carroll Canyon occurs as a result of construction of Mira Mesa Boulevard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 631, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

30171.

(a) On or before October 1, 1980, the commission shall submit to the City of Carlsbad an initial draft of the land use portion of the local coastal program for the area specifically delineated on maps 154 and 155 which have been placed on file with the Secretary of State on April 22, 1980.

(b) On or before July 1, 1981, the commission shall, after public hearing and consultation with the City of Carlsbad, adopt a local coastal program for that area within the City of Carlsbad which is specifically delineated on maps 154 and 155 which have been placed on file with the Secretary of State on April 22, 1980. The local coastal program for such area shall, after adoption by the commission, be deemed certified, and shall, for all purposes of this division, constitute the certified local coastal program for such area. The local coastal program for such area may be amended pursuant to the provisions of this division relating to the amendment of local coastal programs. In addition, until such time as (i) the City of Carlsbad adopts or enacts the implementing actions contained in any such local coastal program, or (ii) other statutory provisions provide alternately for the adoption, certification, and implementation of a local coastal program for that area, the local coastal program required by this subdivision may also be amended by the commission at the request of any owner of property located within the area. For administrative purposes, the commission may group these requests in order to schedule them for consideration at a single commission hearing; provided, however, that the commission shall schedule these requests for consideration at least once during each four-month period, beginning January 1, 1982. After either of these events occur, however, these property owners shall no longer be eligible to request the commission to amend the local coastal program.

(c) If the commission fails to adopt such local coastal program within the time limits specified in this subdivision, such area shall be excluded from the coastal zone and shall no longer be subject to the provisions of this division. It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, that a procedure to expedite the preparation and adoption of a local coastal program in this specified area be established so that the public and affected property owners know as soon as possible what the permissible uses of such lands are.

(d) This section is not intended and shall not be construed as authorizing any modification, extension, or alteration in any deadline or other provisions of any contract between the commission or any regional coastal commission and any person, business, or corporation with respect to planning services for the area delineated on maps 154 and 155.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 43, Sec. 7.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

30171.2.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), on and after January 1, 1985, no agricultural conversion fees may be levied or collected under the agricultural subsidy program provided in the local coastal program of the City of Carlsbad that was adopted and certified pursuant to Section 30171. All other provisions of that program shall continue to be operative, including the right to develop designated areas as provided in the program.

(b) This section shall not affect any right or obligation under any agreement or contract entered into prior to January 1, 1985, pursuant to that agricultural subsidy program, including the payment of any fees and the right of development in accordance